Utah statutes.
63G-6-420 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Factual information to attorney general if collusion suspected.

When for any reason collusion or other anticompetitive practices are suspected among bidders or offerors, a notice of the relevant facts shall be transmitted to the attorney general.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

